North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Part 7. Confidential Information.

§ 131E-97.
Confidentiality of patient information.

Medical records compiled and maintained by health care facilities in connection with the admission, treatment, and discharge of individual patients are not public records as defined by Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

Charges, accounts, credit histories, and other personal financial records compiled and maintained by health care facilities in connection with the admission, treatment, and discharge of individual patients are not public records as defined by Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 570, s. 10.

§ 131E-97.1.
Confidentiality of personnel information.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the personnel files of employees or former employees, and the files of applicants for employment maintained by a public hospital as defined in

G.S. 159-39

or maintained by a hospital that has been sold or conveyed pursuant to

G.S. 131E-8

are not public records as defined by Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

Repealed by Session Laws, 1997-517, s. 3, effective September 17, 1997.

Information regarding the qualifications, competence, performance, character, fitness, or conditions of appointment of an independent contractor who provides health care services under a contract with a public hospital as defined in

G.S. 159-39

, or with a hospital which has been sold or conveyed pursuant to

G.S. 131E-8

, is not a public record as defined by Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. Information regarding a hearing or investigation of a complaint, charge, or grievance by or against an independent contractor who provides health care services under a contract with a public hospital as defined in

G.S. 159-39

or with a hospital which has been sold or conveyed pursuant to

G.S. 131E-8

, is not a public record as defined by Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. Final action making an appointment or discharge or removal by a public hospital having final authority for the appointment or discharge or removal shall be taken in an open meeting, unless otherwise exempted by law. The following information with respect to each independent contractor of health care services of a public hospital, as defined by G.S. 159-39, is a matter of public record: name; age; date of original contract; beginning and ending dates; position title; position descriptions; and total compensation of current and former positions; and the date of the most recent promotion, demotion, transfer, suspension, separation, or other change in position classification.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 570, s. 10; 1995, c. 99, s. 1; c. 509, s. 135.2(q); 1997-517, s. 3.

§ 131E-97.2.
Confidentiality of credentialing information.

Information acquired by a public hospital, as defined in

G.S. 159-39

, a hospital that has been sold or conveyed pursuant to

G.S. 131E-8

, a State-owned or State-operated hospital, or by persons acting for or on behalf of a hospital, in connection with the credentialing and peer review of persons having or applying for privileges to practice in the hospital is confidential and is not a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes; provided that information otherwise available to the public shall not become confidential merely because it was acquired by the hospital or by persons acting for or on behalf of the hospital.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 570, s. 10; 1995, c. 509, s. 135.2(r).

§ 131E-97.3.
Confidentiality of competitive health care information.

For the purposes of this section, competitive health care information means information relating to competitive health care activities by or on behalf of hospitals and public hospital authorities. Competitive health care information does not include any of the information hospitals and ambulatory surgical facilities are required to report under

G.S. 131E-214.12

. Competitive health care information shall be confidential and not a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes; provided that any contract entered into by or on behalf of a public hospital or public hospital authority, as defined in

G.S. 159-39

, shall be a public record unless otherwise exempted by law, or the contract contains competitive health care information, the determination of which shall be as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

If a public hospital or public hospital authority is requested to disclose any contract which the hospital or hospital authority believes in good faith contains or constitutes competitive health care information, the hospital or hospital authority may either redact the portions of the contract believed to constitute competitive health care information prior to disclosure, or if the entire contract constitutes competitive health care information, refuse disclosure of the contract. The person requesting disclosure of the contract may institute an action pursuant to

G.S. 132-9

to compel disclosure of the contract or any redacted portion thereof. In any action brought under this subsection, the issue for decision by the court shall be whether the contract, or portions of the contract withheld, constitutes competitive health care information, and in making its determination, the court shall be guided by the procedures and standards applicable to protective orders requested under Rule 26(c)(7) of the Rules of Civil Procedure. For the purposes of this section, competitive health care information includes, but is not limited to, contracts entered into by or on behalf of a public hospital or public hospital authority to purchase a medical practice. Before rendering a decision, the court shall review the contract in camera and hear arguments from the parties. If the court finds that the contract constitutes or contains competitive health care information, the court may either deny disclosure or may make such other appropriate orders as are permitted under Rule 26(c) of the Rules of Civil Procedure.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prevent an elected public body, in closed session, which has responsibility for the hospital, the Attorney General, or the State Auditor from having access to this confidential information. The disclosure to any public entity does not affect the confidentiality of the information. Members of the public entity shall have a duty not to further disclose the confidential information.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 570, s. 10; 2001-516, s. 5; 2007-508, s. 8.5; 2013-382, s. 10.4.

§ 131E-98.
Inmate medical records. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a hospital does not breach patient confidentiality by providing the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety with the medical records of inmates who receive medical treatment at the hospital while in the custody of the Division. A hospital complying with a request from the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety or its agent for a copy of the medical records of an inmate who received medical services while in custody shall be immune from liability in any civil action for the release of the inmate’s medical record.

History.

1993, c. 321, s. 178(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(wwwww).

§ 131E-98.
Inmate medical records. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a hospital does not breach patient confidentiality by providing the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction with the medical records of inmates who receive medical treatment at the hospital while in the custody of the Division. A hospital complying with a request from the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction or its agent for a copy of the medical records of an inmate who received medical services while in custody shall be immune from liability in any civil action for the release of the inmate’s medical record.

History.

1993, c. 321, s. 178(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(wwwww); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

§ 131E-99.
Confidentiality of health care contracts.

Except for the information a hospital or an ambulatory surgical facility is required to report under

G.S. 131E-214.12

, the financial terms and other competitive health care information directly related to the financial terms in a health care services contract between a hospital or a medical school and a managed care organization, insurance company, employer, or other payer is confidential and not a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. Nothing in this section shall prevent an elected public body which has responsibility for the hospital or medical school from having access to this confidential information in a closed session. The disclosure to a public body does not affect the confidentiality of the information. Members of the public body shall have a duty not to further disclose the confidential information.

History.

1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 713, s. 2; 1997-123, ss. 1, 2; 2013-382, s. 10.5.